Florida, session 2026, HB65.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (4) of section 468.8313, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
468.8313 Examinations.—
(4) The department may review and approve national
examinations and state examinations that otherwise meet the
generally accepted testing standards criteria of national
examinations that the department has certified under s.
455.217(1)(d) by a nationally recognized entity that offers
programs or sets standards that ensure competence as a home
inspector.
Section 2. Section 468.8322, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
468.8322 Insurance.—A home inspector shall maintain a
commercial general liability insurance policy and an errors and
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb65-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 65 2026
omissions insurance policy in an amount of at least not less
than $300,000 per policy.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb65-00